Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 3
Statutory Forms

§ 15-12-301. Statutory form power of attorney.

A document substantially in the following form may be used to create a statutory form power of attorney that has the meaning and effect prescribed in this chapter.

§ 15-12-302. Agent’s certification.

The following optional form may be used by an agent to certify facts concerning a power of attorney.